District of Columbia statutes.
50-1541.25

Rules.

(a)

The Mayor may promulgate rules to carry out the provisions of this chapter pursuant to Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.] and to set fees, taxes, and other charges with respect to the titling, registration, and numbering of vessels, and otherwise to amend the Harbor Regulations (Article 29 of the Police Regulations of the District of Columbia, effective April 26, 1940, as amended; 19 DCMR Chapter 10).

(b)

The Mayor may promulgate the rules to take effect on or after January 1, 2016.

Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-215, § 26, 61 DCR 13083
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-215: Section 32 of D.C. Law 20-215 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2016.